Utah statutes.
17-30-1.   Definitions.
(1)  "Governing body" means the county  legislative body.
(2)  "Appointing authority" means the sheriff of a county having jurisdiction
over any peace officer.
(3)  "Peace officer" means any paid deputy sheriff, other than a chief deputy
designated by the sheriff, who is in the continuous employ of a county.
(4)  "Commission" means the merit system commission consisting of three
persons appointed as provided in Section 17-30-3 and having the duty, power,
and responsibility for the discharge of the functions of this chapter.
(5)  "Department of Public Safety" means the department created in Section
53-1-103.
